sv: Tygväv: Chambray; Dobby; Flanell; Fiskben; Jacquard; Jerseystickning; Linneväv; Matelassé; Mikrofiber; Oxford; Perkal; Satin; Satin; Seersucker; Twill; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tkanina: Šambré; Dobby; Flanel; Rybia kosť; Žakár; Džersejový úplet; Ľanová plátnová väzba; Matelassé; Mikrovlákno; Oxford; Perkál; Satén; Satén; Seersucker; Keper; Iné
pt-PT: Trama do tecido: Chambray; Dobby; Flanela; Espinha de peixe; Jacquard; Malha Jersey; Linho de trama simples; Matelassé; Microfibra; Oxford; Percal; Cetim; Acetinado; Seersucker; Sarja; Outro
ru: Тип переплетения ткани: Шамбре; Добби; Фланель; Елочка; Жаккард; Джерси (трикотажная ткань); Лен полотняного плетения; Мательассе; Микрофибра; Оксфорд; Перкаль; Сатин; Атлас; Сирсакер; Твил; Другой
de: Stoffgewebe: Chambray; Dobby; Flanell; Fischgrätmuster; Jacquard; Jersey-Strick; Leinen, Leinwandbindung; Matelassé; Mikrofaser; Oxford; Perkal; Satin; Seidenmatt; Seersucker; Köper; Sonstiges
fi: Kankaan kudonta: Chambray; Dobby; Flanelli; Kalanruoto; Jacquard; Jersey; Pellava, yksinkertainen kudonta; Matelassé; Mikrokuitu; Oxford; Perkaali; Satiini; Satiini; Seersucker; Tvilli; Muu
nl: Stofweefsel: Chambray; Dobby; Flanel; Visgraat; Jacquard; Jersey breisel; Linnen platbinding; Matelassé; Microvezel; Oxford; Percale; Satijn; Satijn; Seersucker; Keper; Overig
tr: Kumaş dokuma türü: Chambray; Dobby; Flanel; Balıksırtı; Jakarlı; Jersey Örme; Keten Düz Dokuma; Matelassé; Mikrofiber; Oxford; Percale; Saten; Saten; Seersucker; Dimi; Diğer
hr-HR: Tkanje tkanine: Chambray; Dobby; Flanel; Riblja kost; Žakard; Pleteni žersej; Platneno tkanje; Matelassé; Mikrovlakna; Oxford; Perkal; Saten; Saten; Seersucker; Keper; Ostalo
el: Ύφανση υφάσματος: Σαμπρέ; Ντόμπι; Φανελένιο ύφασμα; Ψαροκόκαλο; Ζακάρ; Πλεκτό ζέρσεϊ; Λινό απλής ύφανσης; Ματελασέ; Μικροΐνες; Oxford; Περκάλι; Βαμβακοσατέν; Σατέν; Σιρσάκερ; Twill; Άλλο
hu: Szövet szövési módja: Chambray; Dobby; Flanel; Halszálka; Jacquard; Hurkolt jersey; Egyszerű szövésű lenvászon; Matelassé; Mikroszálas; Oxford; Perkál; Szatén; Szatén; Krepp; Twill; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta tkanja tkanine: Chambray; Dobby; Flanela; Ribja kost; Žakard; Pletenina Jersey; Laneno platno tkanje; Matelassé; Mikrovlakna; Oxford; Perkal; Saten; Saten; Seersucker; Keper; Druga
es: Tipo de tejido: Chambray; Dobby; Franela; Espiga; Jacquard; Jersey de punto; Tejido liso de lino; Matelassé; Microfibra; Oxford; Percal; Satén; Satinado; Seersucker; Sarga; Otros
cs: Vazba tkaniny: Šambré; Dobby; Flanel; Rybí kost; Žakár; Jersey úplet; Plátno; Matlasé; Mikrovlákno; Oxford; Perkál; Satén; Satén; Seersucker; Kepr; Jiné
th: ลักษณะการทอผ้า: แชมเบรย์; ด็อบบี; ผ้าสักหลาด; ก้างปลา; จาการ์ด; ผ้าถักเจอร์ซีย์; ผ้าลินินทอลายขัด; มาเตลาสเซ่; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ทรง Oxford; เพอร์คาเล่; ซาทีน; ซาติน; เซียร์ซักเกอร์; ผ้าทวิล; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Trama do tecido: Chambray; Dobby; Flanela; Herringbone; Jacquard; Malha Jersey; Linho de trama simples; Matelassé; Microfibra; Oxford; Percal; Cetim; Cetim; Seersucker; Sarja; Outro
da: Stofvævning: Cambric; Dobby; Flannel; Sildeben; Jacquard; Jerseystrik; Normalvævet linned; Matelassé; Mikrofiber; Oxford; Percale; Satin; Satin; Seersucker; Twill; Andet
bg-BG: Вид тъкане: Шамбрей; Dobby; Бархет; Рибена кост; Жакард; Джърси плетка; Лен с обикновено тъкане; Matelassé; Микрофибър; Оксфорд; Перкал; Сатен; Сатен; Seersucker; Кепър; Друго
ja: 生地の織り方: シャンブレー; ドビー; フランネル; ヘリンボーン; ジャカード; ジャージーニット; リネン平織り; マテラッセ; マイクロファイバー; オックスフォード; パーケール; サテン; サテン; シアサッカー; ツイル; その他
pl: Splot tkaniny: Splot chambray; Splot dobby; Flanela; Jodełka; Żakard; Dzianina jersey; Splot płócienny lniany; Splot matelassé; Mikrofibra; OxfordS; Splot perkalowy; Splot satynowy; Satyna; Splot seersucker; Twill; Pozostałe
vi: Dệt vải: Vải Chambray; Vải Dobby; Nỉ mỏng; Vòng cổ dây xích; Vải Jacquard; Vải dệt kim Jersey; Vải lanh dệt trơn; Vải Matelassé; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Vải Oxford; Vải Percale; Vải satin; Satin; Vải Seersucker; Vải Twill; Khác
lt-LT: Audinio pynimas: Chambray; Dobby; Flanelė; Eglutės pynė; Jacquard; Jersey Knit; Linen Plain Weave; Matelassé; Mikropluoštas; Oksfordai; Percale; Sateen; Satinas; Seersucker; Tvilas; Kita
it: Trama del tessuto: Chambray; Dobby; Flanella; A spina di pesce; Jacquard; Maglia Jersey; Lino a trama semplice; Matelassé; Microfibra; Oxford; Percalle; Raso; Satinato; Seersucker; Twill; Altro
zh-TW: 織物編織: 青年布; 多臂布; 法蘭絨; 人字紋; 提花; 針織布料; 亞麻平織布; 衍縫布料; 超細纖維; 牛津布; 高級密織薄紗; 緞紋布; 緞面布; 泡泡紗; 斜紋布; 其他
en: Fabric weave: Chambray; Dobby; Flannel; Herringbone; Jacquard; Jersey Knit; Linen Plain Weave; Matelassé; Microfiber; Oxford; Percale; Sateen; Satin; Seersucker; Twill; Other
ro-RO: Țesătură textilă: Chambray; Dobby; Flanel; Spic; Jacard; Jerseu tricotat; In cu țesătură simplă; Matlasat; Microfibră; Oxford; Percale; Satin; Satinat; Seersucker; Tuil; Altele
zh-CN: 织物编织: 青年布; 多臂提花; 法兰绒; 人字呢; 提花; 针织平纹; 亚麻平纹; 法式凸纹; 超细纤维; 牛津布; 高支密平纹; 缎纹; 缎面; 绉布; 斜纹布; 其他
ko: 원단 직조 방식: 샴브레이; 도비; 플란넬; 헤링본; 자카드; 저지 니트; 린넨 평직; 마틀라세; 극세사; 옥스퍼드; 퍼케일; 사틴; 새틴; 시어서커; 능직; 기타
nb: Stoffvev: Cambric; Dobby; Flanell; Fiskebein; Jacquard; Jerseystrikk; Lin vanlig veving; Matelassé; Mikrofiber; Oxford; Percale; Sateng; Sateng; Seesucker; Twill; Annet
fr: Type de tissage: Chambray; Dobby; Flanelle; Chevrons; Jacquard; Jersey; Tissage toile de lin; Matelassé; Microfibre; Oxford; Percale; Satin; Satiné; Seersucker; Twill; Autre